Washington statutes.
RCW 43.04.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "State seal" means the seal of the state as described in Article XVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and in RCW 1.20.080.

(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of state and any designee of the secretary of state.

[ 1988 c 120 s 2.]